Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4805
Notice; service.

(1) Upon filing a petition pursuant to section 43-4804, and at least thirty days prior to the hearing date, the petitioner shall serve a notice of filing, together with a copy of the petition for emancipation and a summons to appear at the hearing, upon:

(a) The parents or legal guardian of the minor or, if the parents or legal guardian cannot be found, the nearest known relative of the minor residing within the state, if any; and

(b) The legal custodian of the minor, if any.

(2) Service and summons shall be made in accordance with section 25-505.01.

(3) Upon a motion and showing by affidavit that service cannot be made with reasonable diligence by any other method provided by statute, the court may permit service to be made (a) by leaving the process at the party's usual place of residence and mailing a copy by first-class mail to the party's last-known address, (b) by publication, or (c) by any manner reasonably calculated under the circumstances to provide the party with actual notice of the proceedings and an opportunity to be heard.

Laws 2018, LB714, § 5.